Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.165

Rules—Insurance benefit reimbursement.

The authority shall adopt rules that provide for members of the legislature who choose reimbursement under RCW 44.04.230 in lieu of insurance benefits under this chapter.

[ 1998 c 62 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 62: See note following RCW 44.04.230.